Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.020

Hearing—Notice.

*Within sixty days after the taking effect of RCW 16.24.010 through 16.24.065, the county legislative authority of each of the several counties of the state may make an order fixing a time and place when a hearing will be had, notice of which shall be published at least once each week for two successive weeks in some newspaper having a general circulation within the county. It shall be the duty of the county legislative authority at the time fixed for such hearing, or at the time to which such hearing may be adjourned, to hear all persons interested in the establishment of range areas or stock restricted areas as defined in RCW 16.24.010 through 16.24.065.

[ 1989 c 286 s 5; 1937 c 40 s 2; 1923 c 33 s 1; 1911 c 25 s 2; RRS s 3069.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 16.24.010 through 16.24.065 took effect March 1, 1937.

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.